New York, session 2025-2026, S8347.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "SNAP for 2 students act". 3 § 2. The social services law is amended by adding a new section 95-b 4 to read as follows: 5 § 95-b. SNAP for students. 1. Definitions. As used in this section: 6 (a) "SNAP" means the supplemental nutrition assistance program as 7 defined in section 3(t) of the federal Food and Nutrition Act of 2008 (7 8 U.S.C. 2012 (t)). 9 (b) "Institution of higher education" means any institution of higher 10 education, recognized and approved by the regents of the university of 11 the state of New York or accredited by a nationally recognized accredit- 12 ing agency or association accepted as such by the regents of the univer- 13 sity of the state of New York, which provides a course of study leading 14 to the granting of a post-secondary degree, certificate or diploma. 15 (c) "Student" means a person who is enrolled at least half-time in an 16 institution of higher education. The number of hours required to be 17 deemed as enrolled at least half-time in an institution of higher educa- 18 tion enrollment shall be determined by the institution of higher educa- 19 tion in which such person is enrolled. 20 2. Creation of informational materials. (a) The office shall create 21 informational materials regarding student eligibility for SNAP benefits, 22 which shall be updated at least annually; provided, however, that the 23 office shall update the informational materials as needed if there are EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11992-01-5 S. 8347 2 1 changes to the eligibility requirements or application process for SNAP 2 benefits before the annual update of such materials. 3 (b) The informational materials created pursuant to paragraph (a) of 4 this subdivision shall be made available on the office's website and on 5 each local social services office's website. 6 (c) The informational materials created pursuant to paragraph (a) of 7 this subdivision shall be made available in English, Spanish, and any 8 other language that is required by law or that the office deems appro- 9 priate. 10 (d) The informational materials shall include, but need not be limited 11 to, information on: 12 (i) the application process and methods of applying for SNAP benefits; 13 (ii) eligibility requirements for students to qualify for SNAP bene- 14 fits; 15 (iii) how to re-apply for SNAP benefits; 16 (iv) sources of assistance for students applying for SNAP benefits or 17 who have questions about SNAP, including but not limited to the contact 18 information for local social services offices and contact information 19 for any and all organizations that aid individuals with SNAP applica- 20 tions; 21 (v) information about programs associated with SNAP, including but not 22 limited to DoubleUp, SNAP-Ed, and SNAP to Market; 23 (vi) a list of stores in the state that allow using SNAP benefits 24 online; and 25 (vii) methods of contacting the office regarding SNAP benefits and 26 other SNAP related inquiries. 27 3. Distribution of informational materials. (a) The office, in coordi- 28 nation with the state education department, shall distribute, at mini- 29 mum, digital versions of the informational materials to every institu- 30 tion of higher education in the state. 31 (b) The office shall have the authority to establish and conduct an 32 outreach program to inform students attending institutions of higher 33 education about SNAP and other sources of aid for combating food insecu- 34 rity. The office shall have the authority to consult and collaborate 35 with any state department, agency, office, division, commission, author- 36 ity or other entity as the office deems appropriate or necessary for the 37 purposes of carrying out the requirements of this section. 38 (c) Every institution of higher education in the state shall be 39 required to notify each student of such institution of such student's 40 potential eligibility for SNAP benefits. Such notification shall be 41 provided at least annually and through electronic means; provided, 42 however, that every institution of higher education shall be authorized 43 to conduct additional outreach and provide additional eligibility 44 notifications as deemed necessary by the institution to comply with the 45 requirements of this section. The notification provided to students 46 shall, to the greatest extent practicable, be specific to New York state 47 and shall provide contact information for the local social services 48 office where an application for SNAP benefits may be submitted. 49 (d) The New York state higher education services corporation shall 50 notify all students that applied for tuition assistance program awards 51 that they may be eligible for SNAP benefits. Such notification shall be 52 provided at least annually and through electronic means. 53 (e) All notifications provided through electronic means regarding 54 potential student eligibility for SNAP benefits shall include, but need 55 not be limited to: S. 8347 3 1 (i) the informational materials created pursuant to subdivision two of 2 this section; 3 (ii) information on where and how to apply for SNAP benefits; 4 (iii) information on obtaining assistance with the application proc- 5 ess; and 6 (iv) information on where to go for more information. 7 4. Annual reports. The office shall submit an annual report to the 8 governor and the legislature which shall be made available to the public 9 on the office's website and which shall include, but need not be limited 10 to: 11 (a) the number of students that applied for SNAP benefits; 12 (b) the number of students that applied for SNAP benefits and were 13 found to be eligible for such benefits; 14 (c) the number of students that received SNAP benefits; 15 (d) the number of institutions of higher education that notified 16 students of potential eligibility for SNAP benefits; 17 (e) a list of all institutions of higher education in the state, indi- 18 cating which institutions complied with the requirements of this 19 section; and 20 (f) an assessment of the effectiveness of this section in notifying 21 students of potential eligibility for SNAP benefits. 22 § 3. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 23 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, 24 the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation neces- 25 sary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 26 authorized to be made and completed on or before such effective date.